Maine, session 132, LD1532.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10108, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Satellite sites; collaboration with Department of Education. The department
may conduct a program under this section in a location owned by a 3rd party through a
lease or partnership with the 3rd party. The commissioner may collaborate with the
Department of Education in designing a curriculum for a program under this section that
qualifies as instruction under Title 20-A, section 4732 and engaging with a secondary
school to participate in the program. A secondary school may elect to participate in the
program. If a secondary school participates in a program under this subsection, the program
may be conducted in whole or in part in a location under this subsection or in whole or in
part at the secondary school or at a facility of the school administrative unit in which the
secondary school is located. A student under Title 20-A, section 5001-A, subsection 3,
paragraph A and a member of the public may attend a program approved for secondary
school instruction under this subsection.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §4732 is enacted to read:
§4732. Outdoor education programs
A secondary school may provide instruction in outdoor education under Title 12,
section 10108 in collaboration with the Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife.
Sec. 3. Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife to conduct programs
at diverse locations in State. By January 1, 2026, the Department of Inland Fisheries
and Wildlife shall secure a minimum of 3 locations in geographically diverse areas of the
State to conduct a program pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 10108,
subsection 13. The Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife shall collaborate with the
Department of Education to develop a curriculum for one or more programs under Title
20-A, section 4732 to be conducted at the locations identified under this section and engage
with secondary schools to participate in the program or programs as soon as practicable in
calendar year 2026.
Sec. 4. Report. By November 4, 2026, the Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife shall submit a report on the securing of and the suitability of locations in which
programs are held and the effectiveness of the collaboration with the Department of
Education and secondary schools under section 3, along with any recommended legislation,
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over inland fisheries
and wildlife matters, which may report out legislation based upon the report to the 133rd
Legislature in 2027.